Hawaii, session 2026, SB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that many elders in the State struggle with Hawaii's high cost of living.  Elders who age at home pay an average of $4,814 per month for home healthcare costs, in addition to other expenses like housing and food.  In 2010, the Philippines implemented a senior citizen discount program to address similar concerns about the high living expenses of elders.  Under Republic Act 9994, also known as the Expanded Senior Citizens Act of 2010, senior citizens in the Philippines receive a twenty per cent discount on the purchase of food, housing, utility services, and other goods and services. The legislature believes that elders in Hawaii would benefit from a similar senior citizen discount program. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of human services to assess the feasibility of offering a twenty per cent discount on certain goods and services for the State's low- to moderate-income elders. SECTION 2. (a)  The department of human services shall conduct a study to assess the feasibility of offering a twenty per cent discount for all low- and moderate-income residents aged sixty-five and older on expenditures for: (1)  Housing, including subsidized rent or public housing; (2)  Utilities; (3)  Food; and (4)  Prescription drugs. (b) The department of human services shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________